Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 4. Hospital Districts
§ 35-2-432.
Refunding securities.

Any securities of the board of a hospital district issued hereunder or pursuant to any other act and payable from any pledged revenues may be refunded by the board by the adoption of a resolution or resolutions by the board authorizing the issuance of securities at public or private sale:

To refund, pay, and discharge all or any part of such outstanding securities of any one (1) or more or all outstanding issues, including any interest thereon in arrears, or about to become due for any period not exceeding three (3) years from the date of the refunding securities; or

For the purpose of reducing interest costs or effecting other economies; or

For the purpose of modifying or eliminating restrictive contractual limitations appertaining to the issuance of additional bonds, otherwise concerning the outstanding securities, or to any facilities appertaining thereto; or

For the purpose of avoiding or terminating any default; or

For any combination thereof.

Nothing contained in this act [§§

35-2-424

through

35-2-436

] nor in any other law of this state shall be construed to permit the board to call securities now or hereafter outstanding for prior redemption in order to refund such securities or in order to pay them prior to their stated maturities, unless the right to call such securities for prior redemption was specifically reserved and stated in such securities at the time of their issuance.

Except as provided in this section, refunding securities shall be subject to the same rights, liabilities, conditions and covenants as are provided for the securities contained in this act.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 25, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 35-136.9.

§ 35-2-433.
Powers and responsibility of board of trustees.

The board of trustees have plenary powers and responsibility for the acquisition, construction, and completion of all projects authorized by the resolution to issue revenue securities or refunding securities.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 25, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 35-136.10.

Hospital trustees have “plenary powers” with respect to their resolution to issue revenue bonds.

Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

“Plenary.” —

“Plenary” means “absolute,” “perfect,” “unqualified.” Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

§ 35-2-434.
Board may accept grants.

The board may accept grants of money or materials or property of any kind from the federal government, the state, any agency or political subdivision thereof, or any person, upon such terms and conditions as the federal government, the state, or such agency or political subdivision, or person may impose.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 25, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 35-136.11.

§ 35-2-435.
Charges and rentals.

The board shall establish and collect charges for services and rentals for use of facilities furnished, acquired, constructed, or purchased from the proceeds of such securities, sufficient to pay the principal or the interest, or both, on the securities as they become due and payable, together with such additional sums as may be deemed necessary for accumulating reserves and providing for obsolescence and depreciation and to pay the expenses of operating and maintaining such facilities. The board shall establish all other charges, fees, and rates to be derived from the operation of the hospital or any other facility of the hospital district.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 25, § 12; W.S. 1957, § 35-136.12.

§ 35-2-436.
Liberal construction.

This act [§§

35-2-424

through

35-2-436

] being necessary to secure the public health, safety, convenience and welfare, shall be liberally construed to effect its purposes.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 25, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 35-136.13.

§ 35-2-437.
Trustee districts by rule; requirements.

When the assessed valuation of the property within a hospital district exceeds three million dollars ($3,000,000.00), the board of trustees for that hospital district may divide the district into no more than three (3) trustee districts and provide for the election of at least one (1) trustee from each trustee district. To become effective, the rule creating trustee districts shall be approved by order of the board of county commissioners of the county in which the greater area of property within the district is located. All trustees shall be residents or property owners of the trustee district from which elected. The board of trustees may provide for the trustees to be elected at-large if these trustees are residents of the hospital district.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 79, § 1.

§ 35-2-438.
Dissolution.

Subject to the requirements of this section, the trustees of a hospital district may vote to dissolve and terminate the district. The plan to dissolve and terminate the district shall provide for the following:

Payment of all bonded and other indebtedness against the district;

Disposition of assets of the district upon dissolution. The assets may either be donated to a nonprofit or governmental hospital or health care facility which provides services to the residents of the hospital district upon such conditions as agreed to by the nonprofit or governmental hospital or health care facility, or conveyed to the county to be used solely for health care purposes by the county.

Before any plan to dissolve and terminate a hospital district is effective, the plan shall be approved by a majority of the qualified electors of the hospital district who vote on the question. The vote on the question may be submitted to the qualified electors at an election following the provisions of W.S.

22-29-404

as applicable. The question to be presented to the qualified electors is: “Shall Hospital District . . . . . be dissolved in accordance with the plan of dissolution approved by the board of trustees?”

Yes
No

Click to view

If the qualified electors of the district approve the dissolution and termination plan, the board of trustees are empowered to take all action necessary to effectuate the plan and dissolve and terminate the hospital district.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 134, § 1; 1996, ch. 97, § 2; 1998, ch. 115, § 2.